Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska70-633
Pledge of revenue; terms; directors to prescribe; officer of district; powers authorized.

Any such resolution or agreement may specify the particular revenue that is pledged and the terms and conditions to be performed by the district and the rights of the holders of such revenue debentures, notes, warrants, bonds, or other evidences of indebtedness, and may provide for priorities of liens in any such revenue as between the holders of revenue debentures, notes, warrants, bonds, or other evidences of indebtedness, issued at different times or under different resolutions or agreements. Any resolution authorizing the issuance of notes may provide for a designated officer or officers of the district to sell the notes from time to time at such price or prices and in such amounts as shall be within the limitations set forth in such resolution. Such resolution may also authorize such officer or officers to determine interest rates, maturity dates, and other terms of such notes subject to any limitations which are necessary and appropriate, as determined by the district's board of directors, to effectuate the issuance and purposes of such notes, as set forth in the resolution.

Laws 1933, c. 86, § 9, p. 350;

Laws 1937, c. 152, § 6, p. 585;

C.S.Supp.,1941, § 70-709;

R.S.1943, § 70-633;

Laws 1944, Spec. Sess., c. 6, § 1(3), p. 110;

Laws 1983, LB 11, § 2.